Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.350

Washington state task force against the trafficking of persons.

(1) There is created the Washington state task force against the trafficking of persons.

(2)(a) The task force shall consist of the following members:

(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(iii) The director of the office of crime victims advocacy, or the director's designee;

(iv) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(v) The secretary of the department of social and health services, or the secretary's designee;

(vi) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(vii) The commissioner of the employment security department, or the commissioner's designee;

(viii) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;

(ix) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent of public instruction's designee;

(x) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's designee;

(xi) At least one member who is a survivor of human trafficking;

(xii) Eleven members, selected by the director of the office of crime victims advocacy, that represent public, community-based nonprofit, and private sector organizations, academic institutions, research-based organizations, faith-based organizations, including organizations that are diverse in viewpoint, geography, ethnicity, and culture, and in the populations served. The members must provide, directly or through their organizations, assistance to persons who are victims and survivors of trafficking, or who work on antitrafficking efforts as part of their organization's work, or both.

(b) Additional members may be selected as determined by the director of the office of crime victims advocacy to ensure representation of interested groups.

(3) The task force shall be chaired by the director of the office of crime victims advocacy, or the director's designee.

(4) The task force shall determine the areas of focus and activity including, but not limited to, the following activities:

(a) Measure and evaluate the resource needs of victims and survivors of human trafficking and the progress of the state in trafficking prevention activities, as well as what is being done in other states and nationally to combat human trafficking;

(b) Identify available federal, state, and local programs that provide services to victims and survivors of trafficking that include, but are not limited to, health care, human services, housing, education, legal assistance, job training or preparation, interpreting services, English as a second language classes, and victim's compensation;

(c) Make recommendations on methods to provide a coordinated system of support and assistance to persons who are victims of trafficking; and

(d) Review the statutory response to human trafficking, analyze the impact and effectiveness of strategies contained in the current state laws, and make recommendations on legislation to further the state's antitrafficking efforts.

(5) The task force shall report its findings and make recommendations to the governor and legislature as needed.

(6) The office of crime victims advocacy shall provide necessary administrative and clerical support to the task force, within available resources.

(7) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, within available resources.

[ 2015 c 273 s 3; 2003 c 266 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 273: See note following RCW 7.68.370.

Effective date—2003 c 266: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2003]." [ 2003 c 266 s 3.]